Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3404
Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Committee; members.

(1) With the exception of the ex officio members, the duly elected directors of Nebraska Poultry Industries, Inc. shall serve as an advisory committee to be known as the Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Committee who shall advise the director on matters relevant to the poultry and egg industry.

(2) The ex officio members shall be designated by the committee. Ex officio members may include, but not be limited to:

(a) The director;

(b) Vice chancellor, University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources;

(c) Chairperson, Department of Animal Sciences, University of Nebraska;

(d) Extension Poultry Specialist, Department of Animal Sciences, University of Nebraska;

(e) General Manager, Nebraska Poultry Industries, Inc.; and

(f) A representative of a consumer organization.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 856, § 1.
December 31, 2027